Utah statutes.
78B-6-141.   Petition, report, and documents sealed -- Exceptions.

(1)  A petition for adoption, the written report described in Section 78B-6-135, and any other documents filed in connection with the petition are sealed. 

(2)  The documents described in Subsection (1) may only be open to inspection as follows:

(a)  in accordance with Subsection (3)(a), by a party to the adoption proceeding:

(i)  while the proceeding is pending; or

(ii)  within six months after the day on which the adoption decree is entered;

(b)  subject to Subsection (3)(b), a court enters an order permitting access to the documents by a person who has appealed the denial of that person's motion to intervene;

(c)  upon order of the court expressly permitting inspection or copying, after good cause has been shown;

(d)  as provided under Section 78B-6-144;

(e)  those records shall become public on the one hundredth anniversary of the date the final decree of adoption was entered; or

(f)  if the adoptee is an adult at the time the final decree of adoption is entered, the documents described in this section are open to inspection and copying without a court order by the adoptee or a parent who adopted the adoptee, unless the final decree of adoption is entered by the juvenile court under Subsection 78B-6-115(3)(b).

(3) (a)  A person who files a motion to intervene in an adoption proceeding:

(i)  is not a party to the adoption proceeding, unless the motion to intervene is granted; and

(ii)  may not be granted access to the documents described in Subsection (1), unless the motion to intervene is granted.

(b)  An order described in Subsection (2)(b) shall:

(i)  prohibit the person described in Subsection (2)(b) from inspecting a document described in Subsection (1) that contains identifying information of the adoptive or potential adoptive parents; and

(ii)  permit the person described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) to review a copy of a document described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) after the identifying information described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) is redacted from the document.

